apertium-ur-hi.ur.dix
    <pardef n="جا__vblex_iv">
      <e>       <p><l>جاؤنگا</l><r>جا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>جائیں گے</l><r>جا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>جا ئینگے</l><r>جا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>جاؤنگی</l><r>جا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>جائینگی</l><r>جا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>جائینگی</l><r>جا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>جائیگا</l><r>جا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>جائیگا</l><r>جا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>جاؤ گے</l><r>جا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>جائیگی</l><r>جا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>جائیگی</l><r>جا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>جاؤگی</l><r>جا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>جائیگا</l><r>جا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>جائیگا</l><r>جا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>جائیں گے</l><r>جا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>جا ئینگے</l><r>جا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>جائیگی</l><r>جا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>جائیگی</l><r>جا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>جائینگی</l><r>جا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>جائینگی</l><r>جا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>جانیوالا</l><r>جا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>جانیوالے</l><r>جا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>جانیوالی</l><r>جا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>جانیوالی</l><r>جا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>جانا</l><r>جا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="inf"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>جانے</l><r>جا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="inf"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>جاؤں</l><r>جا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>جائیں</l><r>جا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>جائیں</l><r>جا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>جاؤ</l><r>جا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>جائیں</l><r>جا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>جائیں</l><r>جا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>جائے</l><r>جا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>جائے</l><r>جا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>جائیں</l><r>جا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>جائیں</l><r>جا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>جائیے</l><r>جا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="frm"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>جائیے</l><r>جا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="frm"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>جا</l><r>جا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="stem"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>جاؤ</l><r>جا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>جاتا</l><r>جا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>جاتیں</l><r>جا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>جاتی</l><r>جا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>جاتیں</l><r>جا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>جاکر</l><r>جا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="gna"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>جاکے</l><r>جا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="gna"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>گیا</l><r>جا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>گئے</l><r>جا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>گئے</l><r>جا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>گئی</l><r>جا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>گئی</l><r>جا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>گئیں</l><r>جا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>گئیں</l><r>جا<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
    <!-- Postpositions -->

    <pardef n="پر__pos">
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="pos"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/کا__pos">
       <e><p><l>کا</l><r>کا<s n="pos"/><s n="shat_ka"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>کے</l><r>کا<s n="pos"/><s n="shat_ke"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>کی</l><r>کا<s n="pos"/><s n="shat_ki"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Conjunctions -->

    <pardef n="اور__cnjcoo">
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="پر__cnjsub">
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="cnjsub"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Numerals -->

    <pardef n="آٹھ__num">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>واں</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n ="m"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>ویں</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n ="f"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="پہلا__num">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
	<pardef n="دو__num">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Adverbs -->

    
    <pardef n="غلط__adv">
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

	<pardef n="چونکہ__cnjadv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cnjadv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef> 
    <!-- Determiners -->
    <pardef n="اس__det">
      <e><p><l>ی</l><r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="kisi"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ے</l><r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="dvi"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ekam"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>کے</l><r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="shat_ke"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>کا</l><r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="shat_ka"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>کی</l><r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="shat_ki"/></r></p></e>
         <e><p><l>نے</l><r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ekam_ne"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="اور"><i>اور</i><par n="اور__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="ہم"><i>ہم</i><par n="اور__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="لیکن"><i>لیکن</i><par n="اور__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="پر"><i>پر</i><par n="پر__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="اگر"><i>اگر</i><par n="پر__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="اگرچہ"><i>اگرچہ</i><par n="پر__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="کہ"><i>کہ</i><par n="پر__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="حالانکہ"><i>حالانکہ</i><par n="پر__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="یا"><i>یا</i><par n="پر__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="بنا"><i>بنا</i><par n="پر__pos"/></e>
    <e lm="بِنا"><i>بِنا</i><par n="پر__pos"/></e>
    <e lm="لئے"><i>لئے</i><par n="پر__pos"/></e>
    <e lm="آگے"><i>آگے</i><par n="پر__pos"/></e>
    <e lm="سے"><i>سے</i><par n="پر__pos"/></e>
    <e lm="میں"><i>میں</i><par n="پر__pos"/></e>
    <e lm="پر"><i>پر</i><par n="پر__pos"/></e>
    <e lm="کو"><i>کو</i><par n="پر__pos"/></e>
    <e lm="کا"><i></i><par n="/کا__pos"/></e>
    <e lm="نے"><i>نے</i><par n="پر__pos"/></e>
    <e lm="ایک"><i>ایک</i><par n="دو__num"/></e>
    <e lm="دو"><i>دو</i><par n="دو__num"/></e>
    <e lm="تین"><i>تین</i><par n="دو__num"/></e>
    <e lm="چار"><i>چار</i><par n="دو__num"/></e>
    <e lm="پانچ"><i>پانچ</i><par n="آٹھ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="پنج"><i>پنج</i><par n="آٹھ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="چھہ"><i>چھہ</i><par n="آٹھ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="سات"><i>سات</i><par n="آٹھ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="پہلی"><i>پہلی</i><par n="پہلا__num"/></e>
    <e lm="اس"><i>اس</i><par n="اس__det"/></e>
    <e lm="دھیرے دھیرے"><i>دھیرے دھیرے</i><par n="غلط__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="دیر"><i>دیر</i><par n="غلط__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="پاس"><i>پاس</i><par n="غلط__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="اوپر"><i>اوپر</i><par n="غلط__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="پاس"><i>پاس</i><par n="غلط__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="درمیان"><i>درمیان</i><par n="غلط__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="تیزی"><i>تیزی</i><par n="غلط__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="جھٹ"><i>جھٹ</i><par n="غلط__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="بٹر"><i>بٹر</i><par n="غلط__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="کہاں"><i>کہاں</i><par n="غلط__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="کم"><i>کم</i><par n="غلط__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="آج"><i>آج</i><par n="غلط__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="موسم"><i>موسم</i><par n="غلط__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="بہت"><i>بہت</i><par n="غلط__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="کل"><i>کل</i><par n="غلط__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="تب"><i>تب</i><par n="غلط__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="باھر"><i>باھر</i><par n="غلط__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="نہیں"><i>نہیں</i><par n="غلط__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ہمیشہ"><i>ہمیشہ</i><par n="غلط__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="سامنے"><i>سامنے</i><par n="غلط__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="بھی"><i>بھی</i><par n="غلط__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="اب"><i>اب</i><par n="غلط__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="دونوں"><i>دونوں</i><par n="غلط__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="جلدی"><i>جلدی</i><par n="غلط__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="کیوں"><i>کیوں</i><par n="غلط__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="جب"><i>جب</i><par n="غلط__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ارد"><i>ارد</i><par n="غلط__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="گرد"><i>گرد</i><par n="غلط__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="یقیناً"><i>یقیناً</i><par n="غلط__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="تو"><i>تو</i><par n="غلط__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="کبھی"><i>کبھی</i><par n="غلط__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="پیچھے"><i>پیچھے</i><par n="غلط__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="شاید"><i>شاید</i><par n="غلط__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="آہستہ"><i>آہستہ</i><par n="غلط__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ابھی"><i>ابھی</i><par n="غلط__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="تک"><i>تک</i><par n="چونکہ__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="پھر"><i>پھر</i><par n="چونکہ__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="کہیں"><i>کہیں</i><par n="چونکہ__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="احتیاط"><i>احتیاط</i><par n="غلط__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="کوئی"><i>کوئی</i><par n="غلط__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="وہاں"><i>وہاں</i><par n="غلط__adv"/></e>
	<e lm="جا"><i></i><par n="جا__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="طرف"><i>طرف</i><par n="پر__pos"/></e>
    <e lm="نیچے"><i>نیچے</i><par n="پر__pos"/></e>
    <e lm="ساتھ"><i>ساتھ</i><par n="پر__pos"/></e>
